Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.450

Members' retirement contributions—Pick up by employer—Optional implementation and withdrawal.

(1) Employers of those members under chapters 41.26, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW who are not specified in RCW 41.04.445 may choose to implement the employer pick up of all member contributions without exception under RCW 41.26.080(1)(a), 41.26.450, 41.40.330(1), 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 and chapter 41.34 RCW. If the employer does so choose, the employer and members shall be subject to the conditions and limitations of RCW 41.04.445 (3), (4), and (5) and 41.04.455.

(2) An employer exercising the option under this section may later choose to withdraw from and/or reestablish the employer pick up of member contributions only once in a calendar year following forty-five days prior notice to the director of the department of retirement systems.

[ 2007 c 492 s 5; 2003 c 294 s 1; 2000 c 247 s 1103; 1995 c 239 s 324; 1985 c 13 s 3; 1984 c 227 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Purpose—Application—Retrospective application—1985 c 13: See notes following RCW 41.04.445.

Effective date—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1984 c 227: See notes following RCW 41.04.440.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.